California statutes. Civil Code
(b) Maintain the confidentiality of information which has come to their knowledge in the course of the performance of their
 tasks or exercise of their powers, except to the extent that disclosure is required by the Public Records Act.

(c) Remain free from external influence, whether direct or indirect, and shall neither seek nor take instructions from another.

(d) Refrain from any action incompatible with their duties and engaging in any incompatible occupation, whether gainful or not, during their term.

(e) Have the right of access to all information made available by the agency to the chairperson.

(f) Be precluded, for a period of one year after leaving office, from accepting employment with a business that was subject to an enforcement action or civil action under this title during the member’s tenure or during the five-year period preceding the member’s appointment.

(g) Be precluded for a period of two years after leaving office from acting, for compensation, as an agent or attorney for, or otherwise representing, any other person in a matter pending before the agency if the purpose is to influence an action of the agency.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 24, Sec. 24.2.   Effective December 16, 2020.   Operative December 16, 2020, pursuant to Sec. 31 of Proposition 24.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.199.20.

Members of the agency board, including the chairperson, shall serve at the pleasure of their appointing authority but shall serve for no longer than eight consecutive years.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 24, Sec. 24.3.   Effective December 16, 2020.   Operative December 16, 2020, pursuant to Sec. 31 of Proposition 24.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.199.25.

For each day on which they engage in official duties, members of the agency board shall be compensated at the rate of one hundred dollars ($100), adjusted pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1798.199.95, and shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in performance of their official duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 121, Sec. 10.   (AB 3286)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.199.30.

The agency board shall appoint an executive director who shall act in accordance with agency policies and regulations and with applicable law. The agency shall appoint and discharge officers, counsel, and employees, consistent with applicable civil service laws, and shall fix the compensation of employees and prescribe their duties. The agency may contract for services that cannot be provided by its employees.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 24, Sec. 24.5.   Effective December 16, 2020.   Operative December 16, 2020, pursuant to Sec. 31 of Proposition 24.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.199.35.

The agency board may delegate authority to the chairperson or the executive director to act in the name of the agency between meetings of the agency, except with respect to resolution of enforcement actions and rulemaking authority.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 24, Sec. 24.6.   Effective December 16, 2020.   Operative December 16, 2020, pursuant to Sec. 31 of Proposition 24.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.199.40.

The agency shall perform the following functions:

(a) Administer, implement, and enforce through administrative actions this title.

(b) On and after the later of July 1, 2021, or within six months of the agency providing the Attorney General with notice that it is prepared to assume rulemaking responsibilities under this title, adopt, amend, and rescind regulations pursuant to Section 1798.185 to carry out the purposes and provisions of the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018, including regulations specifying recordkeeping requirements for businesses to ensure compliance with this title.

(c) Through the implementation of this title, protect the
 fundamental privacy rights of natural persons with respect to the use of their personal information.

(d) Promote public awareness and understanding of the risks, rules, responsibilities, safeguards, and rights in relation to the collection, use, sale, and disclosure of personal information, including the rights of minors with respect to their own information, and provide a public report summarizing the risk assessments filed with the agency pursuant to paragraph (14) of subdivision (a) of Section 1798.185 while ensuring that data security is not compromised.

(e) Provide guidance to consumers regarding their rights under this title.

(f) Provide guidance to businesses regarding their duties and responsibilities
 under this title and appoint a Chief Privacy Auditor to conduct audits of businesses to ensure compliance with this title pursuant to regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (17) of subdivision (a) of Section 1798.185.

(g) Provide technical assistance and advice to the Legislature, upon request, with respect to privacy-related legislation.

(h) Monitor relevant developments relating to the protection of personal information and, in particular, the development of information and communication technologies and commercial practices.

(i) Cooperate with other agencies with jurisdiction over privacy laws and with data processing authorities in California, other states, territories, and countries to ensure consistent application
 of privacy protections.

(j) Establish a mechanism pursuant to which persons doing business in California that do not meet the definition of business set forth in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 1798.140 may voluntarily certify that they are in compliance with this title, as set forth in paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 1798.140, and make a list of those entities available to the public.

(k) Solicit, review, and approve applications for grants to the extent funds are available pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1798.160.

(l) Perform all other acts necessary or appropriate in the exercise of its power, authority, and jurisdiction and seek to balance the goals
 of strengthening consumer privacy while giving attention to the impact on businesses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 121, Sec. 11.   (AB 3286)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.199.45.

(a) Upon the sworn complaint of any person or on its own initiative, the agency may investigate possible violations of this title relating to any business, service provider, contractor, or person. The agency may decide not to investigate a complaint or decide to provide a business with a time period to cure the alleged violation. In making a decision not to investigate or provide more time to cure, the agency may consider the following:

(1) Lack of intent to violate this title.

(2) Voluntary efforts undertaken by the business, service provider, contractor, or person to cure the alleged violation prior to being notified
 by the agency of the complaint.

(b) (1) The agency shall notify in writing the person who made the complaint of the action, if any, the agency has taken or plans to take on the complaint, together with the reasons for that action or nonaction.

 (2) The written notification required by this subdivision shall not include information that is subject to law enforcement exemptions and privileges, including, but not limited to, confidential information related to an investigation and information that is privileged under the Evidence Code and the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 121, Sec. 12.   (AB 3286)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.199.50.

No finding of probable cause to believe this title has been violated shall be made by the agency unless, at least 30 days prior to the agency’s consideration of the alleged violation, the business, service provider, contractor, or person alleged to have violated this title is notified of the violation by service of process or registered mail with return receipt requested, provided with a summary of the evidence, and informed of their right to be present in
 person and represented by counsel at any proceeding of the agency held for the purpose of considering whether probable cause exists for believing the person violated this title. Notice to the alleged violator shall be deemed made on the date of service, the date the registered mail receipt is signed, or if the registered mail receipt is not signed, the date returned by the post office. A proceeding held for the purpose of considering probable cause shall be private unless the alleged violator files with the agency a written request that the proceeding be public.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 24, Sec. 24.9.   Effective December 16, 2020.   Operative December 16, 2020, pursuant to Sec. 31 of Proposition 24.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.199.55.

(a) When the agency determines there is probable cause for believing this title has been violated, it shall hold a hearing to determine if a violation has or violations have occurred. Notice shall be given and the hearing conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The agency shall have all the powers granted by that chapter. If the agency determines on the basis of the hearing conducted pursuant to this subdivision that a violation or violations have occurred, it shall issue an order that may require the violator to do all or any of the following:

(1) Cease and desist violation of this title.

(2) Subject to Section 1798.155, pay an administrative fine of up to two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation, or up to seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) for each intentional violation and each violation involving the personal information of minor consumers. When the agency determines that no violation has occurred, it shall publish a declaration so stating.

(A) Ninety-five percent of any administrative fine assessed pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited into the Consumer Privacy Subfund created within the Consumer Privacy Fund pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1798.160.

(B) Five percent of any administrative fine assessed pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited into the Consumer Privacy Grant Subfund created within the Consumer Privacy Fund pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section
 1798.160.

(b) If two or more persons are responsible for any violation or violations, they shall be jointly and severally liable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 20, Sec. 3.   (AB 137)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.199.60.

Whenever the agency rejects the decision of an administrative law judge made pursuant to Section 11517 of the Government Code, the agency shall state the reasons in writing for rejecting the decision.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 24, Sec. 24.11.   Effective December 16, 2020.   Operative December 16, 2020, pursuant to Sec. 31 of Proposition 24.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.199.65.

The agency may subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance and testimony, administer oaths and affirmations, take evidence and require by subpoena the production of any books, papers, records, or other items material to the performance of the agency’s duties or exercise of its powers, including, but not limited to, its power to audit a business’ compliance with this title.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 24, Sec. 24.12.   Effective December 16, 2020.   Operative December 16, 2020, pursuant to Sec. 31 of Proposition 24.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.199.70.

No administrative action brought pursuant to this title alleging a violation of any of the provisions of this title shall be commenced more than five years after the date on which the violation occurred.

(a) The service of the probable cause hearing notice, as required by Section 1798.199.50, upon the person alleged to have violated this title shall constitute the commencement of the
 administrative action.

(b) If the person alleged to have violated this title engages in the fraudulent concealment of the person’s acts or identity, the five-year period shall be tolled for the period of the concealment. For purposes of this subdivision, “fraudulent concealment” means the person knows of material facts related to the person’s duties under this title and knowingly conceals them in performing or omitting to perform those duties for the purpose of defrauding the public of information to which it is entitled under this title.

(c) If, upon being ordered by a superior court to produce any documents sought by a subpoena in any administrative proceeding under this title, the person alleged to have violated this title fails to produce documents in response to the order by the date ordered to comply therewith, the five-year period shall be tolled for the period of the delay
 from the date of filing of the motion to compel until the date the documents are produced.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 24, Sec. 24.13.   Effective December 16, 2020.   Operative December 16, 2020, pursuant to Sec. 31 of Proposition 24.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.199.75.

(a) In addition to any other available remedies, the agency may bring a civil action and obtain a judgment in superior court for the purpose of collecting any unpaid administrative fines imposed pursuant to this title after exhaustion of judicial review of the agency’s action. The action may be filed as a small claims, limited civil, or unlimited civil case depending on the jurisdictional amount. The venue for this action shall be in
 the county where the administrative fines were imposed by the agency. In order to obtain a judgment in a proceeding under this section, the agency shall show, following the procedures and rules of evidence as applied in ordinary civil actions, all of the following:

(1) That the administrative fines were imposed following the procedures set forth in this title and implementing regulations.

(2) That the defendant or defendants in the action were notified, by actual or constructive notice, of the imposition of the administrative fines.

(3) That a demand for payment has been made by the agency and full payment has not been received.

(b) A civil action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be commenced within four years after the date on which the
 administrative fines were imposed.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 24, Sec. 24.14.   Effective December 16, 2020.   Operative December 16, 2020, pursuant to Sec. 31 of Proposition 24.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.199.80.

(a) If the time for judicial review of a final agency order or decision has lapsed, or if all means of judicial review of the order or decision have been exhausted, the agency may apply to the clerk of the court for a judgment to collect the administrative fines imposed by the order or decision, or the order as modified in accordance with a decision on judicial review.

(b) The application, which shall include a certified copy of the order or decision, or the order as modified in accordance with a decision on judicial review, and proof of service of the order or decision, constitutes a sufficient showing to warrant issuance of the judgment to collect the administrative fines. The clerk of the court shall enter the judgment immediately in conformity with the application.

(c) An application made pursuant to this section shall be made to the clerk of the superior court in the county where the administrative fines were imposed by the agency.

(d) A judgment entered in accordance with this section has the same force and effect as, and is subject to all the provisions of law relating to, a judgment in a civil action and may be enforced in the same manner as any other judgment of the court in which it is entered.

(e) The agency may bring an application pursuant to this section only within four years after the date on which all means of judicial review of the order or decision have been exhausted.

(f) The remedy available under this section is in addition to those available under any other law.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 24, Sec. 24.15.   Effective December 16, 2020.   Operative December 16, 2020, pursuant to Sec. 31 of Proposition 24.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.199.85.

Any decision of the agency with respect to a complaint or administrative fine shall be subject to judicial review in an action brought by an interested party to the complaint or administrative fine and shall be subject to an abuse of discretion standard.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 24, Sec. 24.16.   Effective December 16, 2020.   Operative December 16, 2020, pursuant to Sec. 31 of Proposition 24.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.199.90.

(a) Any business, service provider, contractor, or other person that violates this title shall be subject to an injunction and liable for a civil penalty of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation or seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) for each intentional violation and each violation involving the personal information of minor consumers, as adjusted pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1798.199.95, which shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General. The court may consider the good faith cooperation of the business, service provider, contractor, or other person in determining the amount of the civil penalty.

(b) (1) (A) Ninety-five percent of any civil penalty recovered by an action brought by the Attorney General for a violation of this title, and of the proceeds of any settlement of those actions, shall be deposited into the Attorney General Consumer Privacy Enforcement Subfund created within the Consumer Privacy Fund pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1798.160 to support the Attorney General in the enforcement of this title.

(B) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, the Attorney General may, if an action or settlement is the result of a joint investigation with the agency, deposit a portion of the penalties and proceeds that would otherwise be subject to subparagraph (A) into the Consumer Privacy Subfund created within the Consumer Privacy Fund pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1798.160 in the amount necessary to provide reimbursement for investigative costs.

(2) Five percent of any civil
 penalty recovered by an action brought by the Attorney General for a violation of this title, and of the proceeds of any settlement of those actions, shall be deposited into the Consumer Privacy Grant Subfund created within the Consumer Privacy Fund pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1798.160.

(c) The agency shall, upon request by the Attorney General, stay an administrative action or investigation under this title to permit the Attorney General to proceed with an investigation or civil action and shall not pursue an administrative action or investigation, unless the Attorney General subsequently determines not to pursue an investigation or civil action. The agency may not limit the authority of the Attorney General to enforce this title.

(d) No civil action may be filed by the Attorney General under this section for any violation of this title after
 the agency has issued a decision pursuant to Section 1798.199.85 or an order pursuant to Section 1798.199.55 against that person for the same violation.

(e) This section shall not affect the private right of action provided for in Section 1798.150.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 20, Sec. 4.   (AB 137)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.199.95.

(a) There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund of the state to the agency the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) during the fiscal year 2020–21, and the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) adjusted for cost-of-living changes, during each fiscal year thereafter, for expenditure to support the operations of the agency pursuant to this title. The expenditure of funds under this appropriation shall be subject to the normal administrative review given to other state appropriations. The Legislature shall appropriate those additional amounts to the commission and other agencies as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this title.

(b) The Department of
 Finance, in preparing the state budget and the Budget Act bill submitted to the Legislature, shall include an item for the support of this title that shall indicate all of the following:

(1) The amounts to be appropriated to other agencies to carry out their duties under this title, which amounts shall be in augmentation of the support items of those agencies.

(2) The additional amounts required to be appropriated by the Legislature to the agency to carry out the purposes of this title, as provided for in this section.

(3) In parentheses, for informational purposes, the continuing appropriation during each fiscal year of ten million dollars ($10,000,000), adjusted for cost-of-living changes made pursuant to this
 section.

(c) The Attorney General shall provide staff support to the agency until the agency has hired its own staff. The Attorney General shall be reimbursed by the agency for these services.

(d) (1) On January 1, 2025, and on January 1 of any odd-numbered year thereafter, the California Privacy Protection Agency shall adjust the monetary thresholds in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 1798.140, subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1798.150, subdivision (a) of Section 1798.155, Section 1798.199.25, and subdivision (a) of Section 1798.199.90 to reflect any increase in the Consumer Price Index.

(2) The agency shall use the Consumer Price Index
 (CPI) - California, All Items, All Urban Consumers percentage change from the previous two years’ reports, published by the Department of Industrial Relations, Office of the Director–Research. The agency shall apply the percentage change in the CPI for the August-to-August point in time of the prior two years. The increase in the thresholds shall be rounded to the nearest whole dollar.

(3) The agency shall post the adjusted monetary thresholds on its internet website no later than January 15 of the year in which the adjustment becomes effective.

(4) Notwithstanding any other law,
 adjustments to monetary thresholds and their publication on the agency’s internet website pursuant to this subdivision are not subject to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 121, Sec. 14.   (AB 3286)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.199.100.

The agency and any court, as applicable, shall consider the good faith cooperation of the business, service provider, contractor, or other person in determining the amount of any administrative fine or civil penalty for a violation of this title. A business shall not be required by the agency, a court, or otherwise to pay both an administrative fine and a civil penalty for the same violation.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 24, Sec. 24.19.   Effective December 16, 2020.   Operative December 16, 2020, pursuant to Sec. 31 of Proposition 24.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.81.6. Identity Theft in Business Entity Filings [1798.200. - 1798.203.]

1798.200.

For purposes of this title, the following terms are defined as follows:

(a) “Business entity filing” means a document required by law to be filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to the Corporations Code, the Financial Code, or the Insurance Code.

(b) “Personal identifying information” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 530.55 of the Penal
 Code.

(c) “Person” means a natural person, firm, association, organization, partnership, business trust, company, corporation, limited liability company, or public entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 696, Sec. 1.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.201.

A person who has learned or reasonably suspects that his or her personal identifying information has been used unlawfully, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 530.5 of the Penal Code, in a business entity filing, and has initiated a law enforcement investigation in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 530.6 of the Penal Code, may petition the superior court in the county in which the person resides for an order, which may be granted ex parte, directing the alleged perpetrator of the
 act described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 530.5 of the Penal Code, if known, and the person using the personal identifying information in the business entity filing to appear at a hearing before the court and show cause for both of the following:

(a) Why the personal identifying information should not be labeled to show the information is impersonated and does not reflect the person’s identity.

(b) Why the personal identifying information should be associated with the business entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 696, Sec. 1.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.202.

(a) A petition filed pursuant to Section 1798.201 shall be heard and determined based on declarations, affidavits, police reports, or other material, relevant, and reliable information submitted by the parties or ordered to be made part of the record by the court.

(b) If the court determines the petition is meritorious and there is no reasonable cause to believe that the victim’s personal identifying information has been used lawfully in the business entity filing, the court shall make a finding that the victim’s personal identifying information has been used unlawfully in the business entity filing and shall issue an order certifying this determination.

(c) Upon making a determination pursuant to
 subdivision (b), the court shall do the following:

(1) Order the name and associated personal identifying information in the business entity filing to be redacted or labeled to show that the data is impersonated and does not reflect the victim’s identity.

(2) Order the data to be removed from publicly accessible electronic indexes and databases.

(d) A determination made pursuant to subdivision (b) may be vacated at any time if the petition or any information submitted in support of the petition is found to contain any material misrepresentation or was obtained by fraud.

(e) The Judicial Council shall develop a form for issuing an order of determination pursuant to this section.

(f) An
 order issued pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

(g) If an order has been filed pursuant to subdivision (f) within the record of a limited liability company or a corporation, the Secretary of State may cancel the business entity that is the subject of the order if, after 60 days, an updated statement of information has not been filed on behalf of the entity with the Secretary of State. The statement of information shall not contain any information ordered to be redacted pursuant to subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 783, Sec. 1.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.203.

(a) In addition to any of the other remedies provided under this title, a person who has learned that their personal identifying information has been used unlawfully, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 530.5 of the Penal Code, in a business entity filing may file with the Secretary of State a disclaimer of proper authority, as described in subdivision (b) and on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, so long as the business entity has not been dissolved or terminated at the time of filing the disclaimer.

(b) A disclaimer of proper authority shall be signed and verified under penalty of perjury by the person claiming their personal identifying information was unlawfully used in the business entity filing as described in
 subdivision (a) and shall contain all of the following information:

(1) The name of the corporation, limited liability company, or limited partnership as it appears on the records of the Secretary of State.

(2) The Secretary of State file number for the corporation, limited liability company, or limited partnership.

(3) The entity type.

(4) The date the business entity document containing their personal identifying information was filed.

(5) The title of the business entity document that contained their personal identifying information.

(6) A description of the type of personal identifying information that the person claims
 was used unlawfully in the business entity filing.

(7) A statement that the person signing the disclaimer of proper authority did not authorize the use of their personal identifying information within the business entity document and that they reasonably suspect that their personal identifying information was included in furtherance of an unlawful purpose, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 530.5 of the Penal Code.

(8) A statement that the disclaimer of proper authority does not constitute a determination of any court or law enforcement investigation surrounding the facts and circumstances of the use of the information within the business entity document.

(c) The fee for filing a disclaimer of proper authority pursuant to this section shall be thirty dollars ($30) to cover the reasonable costs to the
 Secretary of State of processing that form.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 783, Sec. 2.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.81.7. Reproductive and Gender-Affirming Health Care Services [1798.300. - 1798.308.]

1798.300.

As used in this title, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Abusive litigation” means litigation or other legal action to deter, prevent, sanction, or punish a person engaging in legally protected health care activity by either of the following:

(1) Filing or prosecuting an action in a state other than California where liability, in whole or part, directly or indirectly, is based on a legally protected health care activity that was legal in the state in which it occurred, including an action in which liability is based on a theory of vicarious, joint, or several liability.

(2) Attempting to enforce an order or judgment issued in
 connection with an action described in paragraph (1) by a party to that action or a person acting on behalf of a party to that action. An action shall be considered to be based on conduct that was legal in the state in which it occurred if a part of an act or omission involved in the course of conduct that forms the basis for liability in the action occurs or is initiated in a state in which the health care was legal, whether or not the act or omission is alleged or included in a pleading or other filing in the lawsuit.

(b) “Aggrieved person, provider, or other entity” includes, but is not limited to, a person who resides in California, a business or entity doing business in the state or located in the state, a health care service plan, a health insurer, a person or entity that provided a legally protected health care activity in California, a person who received a legally protected health care activity from a provider licensed in California, a
 person or entity that is licensed in California to provide a legally protected health care activity, including a provider, clinic, or a person who assisted a person or entity that received or provided a legally protected health care activity in California.

(c) “Gender-affirming health care services” and “gender-affirming mental health care services” have the same meaning as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 16010.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(d) (1) “Legally protected health care activity” means any of the following:

(A) The exercise and enjoyment, or attempted exercise and enjoyment, by a person of rights to reproductive health care services, gender-affirming health care services, or gender-affirming mental health care services secured by the Constitution or laws
 of California or the provision by a health care service plan contract or a policy, or a certificate of health insurance, that provides for such services.

(B) An act or omission undertaken to aid or encourage, or attempt to aid or encourage, a person in the exercise and enjoyment or attempted exercise and enjoyment of rights to reproductive health care services, gender-affirming health care services, or gender-affirming mental health care services secured by the Constitution or laws of California.

(C) The provision of reproductive health care services, gender-affirming health care services, or gender-affirming mental health care services by a person duly licensed under the laws of California
 or the coverage of, and reimbursement for, such services or care by a health care service plan or a health insurer, if the service or care is lawful under the laws of California, regardless of the patient’s location.

(2) “Legally protected health care activity” does not include any activity that would be deemed unprofessional conduct or that would violate antidiscrimination laws of California.

(e) “Reproductive health care services” means and includes all services, care, or products of a medical, surgical, psychiatric, therapeutic, diagnostic, mental health, behavioral health, preventative, rehabilitative, supportive, consultative, referral,
 prescribing, or dispensing nature relating to the human reproductive system provided in accordance with the constitution and laws of this state, whether provided in person or by means of telehealth services which includes, but is not limited to, all services, care, and products relating to pregnancy, the termination of a pregnancy, assisted reproduction, or contraception.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260, Sec. 6.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.301.

Reproductive health care services, gender-affirming health care services, and gender-affirming mental health care services are rights secured by the Constitution and laws of California. Interference with these rights, whether or not under the color of law, is against the public policy of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260, Sec. 6.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.302.

A public act or record of a foreign jurisdiction that prohibits, criminalizes, sanctions, authorizes a person to bring a civil action against, or otherwise interferes with a person, provider, or other entity in California that seeks, receives, causes, aids in access to, aids, abets, provides, or attempts or intends to seek, receive, cause, aid in access to, aid, abet, or provide, reproductive health care services, gender-affirming health care services, or gender-affirming mental health care services shall be an interference with the exercise and enjoyment of the rights secured by the Constitution and laws of California and shall be a violation of the public policy of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260, Sec. 6.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.303.

If a person, whether or not acting under color of law, engages or attempts to engage in abusive litigation that infringes on or interferes with, or attempts to infringe on or interfere with, a legally protected health care activity, then an aggrieved person, provider, carrier, or other entity, including a defendant in the abusive litigation, may institute a civil action for injunctive, monetary, or other appropriate relief within three years after the cause of action accrues.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260, Sec. 6.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.304.

An aggrieved person, provider, or other entity, including a defendant in abusive litigation, may move to modify or quash a subpoena issued in connection with abusive litigation on the grounds that the subpoena is unreasonable, oppressive, or inconsistent with the public policy of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260, Sec. 6.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.305.

If the court finds for the petitioner in an action authorized by Section 1798.303, recovery shall be in the amount of three times the amount of actual damages, which shall include damages for the amount of a judgment issued in connection with an abusive litigation, and any other expenses, costs, or reasonable attorney’s fees incurred in connection with the abusive litigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260, Sec. 6.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.306.

(a) A court may exercise jurisdiction over a person in an action authorized by Section 1798.303 if any of the following apply:

(1) Personal jurisdiction is found under Section 410.10 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(2) The person has commenced an action in a court in California and, during the pendency of that action or an appeal therefrom, a summons and complaint is served on the person or the attorney appearing on the person’s behalf in that action or as otherwise permitted by law.

(3) The exercise of jurisdiction is permitted under the Constitution of the United States.

(b) This section does not apply to a lawsuit or judgment entered in another state that is based on conduct for which a cause of action exists under the laws of California, including a contract, tort, common law, or statutory claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260, Sec. 6.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.307.

Notwithstanding any other law, the laws of California shall govern in a case or controversy heard in California related to reproductive health care services, gender-affirming health care services, or gender-affirming mental health care services, except as may be required by federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260, Sec. 6.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.308.

This title shall not be construed to provide jurisdiction over a California resident in an out-of-state forum when the California resident has not availed themselves of that forum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260, Sec. 6.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.81.9. Digital Age Assurance Act [1798.500. - 1798.505.]

1798.500.

For the purposes of this title:

(a) (1) “Account holder” means an individual who is at least 18 years of age or a parent or legal guardian of a user who is under 18 years of age in the state.

(2) “Account holder” does not include a parent of an emancipated minor or a parent or legal guardian who is not associated with a user’s device.
